Hawaii statutes.
§261-5.6 Rental motor vehicle customer
facility charge special fund. (a) There is established in the state
treasury the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special fund to be
administered by the director, into which shall be deposited all proceeds from
the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge.

(b) Moneys in the rental motor vehicle
customer facility charge special fund shall be used for enhancement,
renovation, operation, and maintenance of existing rental motor vehicle
customer facilities and the development of new rental motor vehicle customer
facilities and related services at state airports, including:

(1) Acquisition and maintenance of property or
property rights for rental motor vehicle purposes;

(2) Acquisition of equipment for and operation of a
unified shuttle bus system to and from passenger terminals and the rental motor
vehicle customer facilities;

(3) Consultant fees;

(4) Management, operation, and maintenance fees for
rental motor vehicle customer facilities; and

(5) Conceptual plans, plans, design, construction,
operation, and maintenance of, or allocable to, the approved rental motor
vehicle customer facilities and related services.

In planning the future needs and expenditures of
these moneys, the director, or deputy designated by the director, shall, at
least once a year, consult with lessors, as defined in section 437D-3, who are
using or who in the future may use the facilities and services. No moneys
shall be expended to plan, design, improve, enhance, acquire, or construct
rental motor vehicle customer facilities, equipment, or services shared or to
be shared by rental motor vehicle concessions at a state airport except as
determined by the director; provided that the director shall not approve the
expenditure of any moneys except for planning and design purposes to improve or
construct rental motor vehicle customer facilities and related services located
at an airport until a concession bid for rental motor vehicle concessions
located at the public airport as of July 1, 2008, is first advertised, bid upon,
and awarded by the department of transportation.

(c) The rental motor vehicle customer facility
charge special fund shall be exempt from sections 36-30 and 103-8.5.

(d) Any resolution or certificate authorizing
any issue of bonds relating to the use of the rental motor vehicle customer
facility charge for an airport capital improvement program project approved by
the legislature may establish other accounts within the rental motor vehicle
customer facility charge special fund and require the transfer of the rental
motor vehicle customer facility charge into the other accounts to pay debt
service on the related bonds. [L 2008, c 226, §2; am L 2010, c 204, §2]

Note

Annual reports to legislature through 2018. L 2008, c 226,
§11.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next